Arkansas, session 2025, SB187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-77-143(c)(2), concerning the individuals
appointed to the Arkansas Medicaid Drug Utilization Review Board, is amended
to read as follows:
(2) The individuals appointed under subdivision (c)(1) of this
section shall be:
(A) Either physicians Physicians, physician assistants, or
advanced practice registered nurses;
(B) Licensed and practicing in this state; and
(C) Currently treating rare diseases or conditions.







*JMB167*
02/04/2025 8:25:10 AM JMB167